Alaska, session 34, SB32.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 42.05.431 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (i) Costs incurred by an electric cooperative utility organized under AS 10.25 06 that participates in an electric reliability organization certificated by the commission 07 under AS 42.05.760 must be allowed in the rates charged by the utility if the costs are 08 approved by the utility's board of directors in connection with a new or purchased 09 renewable energy facility or battery energy storage system with a nameplate capacity 10 of less than 15,000 kilowatts or power purchased from a renewable energy facility or 11 battery energy storage system with a nameplate capacity of less than 15,000 kilowatts. 12 In this subsection, "renewable energy facility" means a facility that generates 13 electricity from geothermal, wind, solar, hydroelectric, hydrokinetic, tidal, or biomass 14 energy or another renewable energy resource. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.